California statutes. Education Code
 criteria. Until the school facility inspection and evaluation instrument is approved by the board, “good repair” means the facility is maintained in a manner that assures that it is clean, safe, and functional as determined by the interim evaluation instrument developed by the Office of Public School Construction or a local evaluation instrument that meets the same criteria as the interim evaluation instrument. The school facility inspection and evaluation instrument and local evaluation instruments that meet the minimum criteria of this subdivision shall not require capital enhancements beyond the standards to which the facility was designed and constructed. In order to provide that school facilities are reviewed to be clean, safe, and functional, the school facility inspection and evaluation instrument and local evaluation instruments shall include at least the following criteria:

(A) Gas systems and pipes appear and smell safe, functional,
 and free of leaks.

(B) Mechanical systems, including heating, ventilation, and air-conditioning systems, satisfy the following:

(i) Are functional and unobstructed.

(ii) Appear to supply adequate amount of air to all classrooms, work spaces, and facilities.

(iii) Maintain interior temperatures within normally acceptable ranges.

(C) Doors and windows are intact, functional, and open, close, and lock as designed, unless there is a valid reason they should not function as designed.

(D) Fences and gates are intact, functional, and free of holes and other conditions that could present a safety hazard to pupils, staff, or others.
 Locks and other security hardware function as designed.

(E) Interior surfaces, including walls, floors, and ceilings, are free of safety hazards from tears, holes, missing floor and ceiling tiles, torn carpet, water damage, or other cause. Ceiling tiles are intact. Surfaces display no evidence of mold or mildew.

(F) Hazardous and flammable materials are stored properly. No evidence of peeling, chipping, or cracking paint is apparent. No indicators of mold, mildew, or asbestos exposure are evident. There is no apparent evidence of hazardous materials that may pose a threat to the health and safety of pupils or staff.

(G) Structures, including posts, beams, supports for portable classrooms and ramps, and other structural building members appear intact, secure, and functional as designed. Ceilings and floors are not
 sloping or sagging beyond their intended design. There is no visible evidence of severe cracks, dry rot, mold, or damage that undermines structural components.

(H) Fire sprinklers, fire extinguishers, emergency alarm systems, and all emergency equipment and systems appear to be functioning properly. Fire alarm pull stations are clearly visible. Fire extinguishers are current and placed in all required areas, including every classroom and assembly area. Emergency exits are clearly marked and unobstructed.

(I) Electrical systems, components, and equipment, including switches, junction boxes, panels, wiring, outlets, and light fixtures, are securely enclosed, properly covered and guarded from pupil access, and appear to be working properly.

(J) Lighting appears to be adequate and working properly. Lights do not flicker,
 dim, or malfunction, and there is no unusual hum or noise from light fixtures. Exterior lights onsite appear to be working properly.

(K) No visible or odorous indicators of pest or vermin infestation are evident.

(L) Interior and exterior drinking fountains are functional, accessible, and free of leaks. Drinking fountain water pressure is adequate. Fountain water is clear and without unusual taste or odor, and moss, mold, or excessive staining is not evident.

(M) Restrooms and restroom fixtures satisfy the following:

(i) Are functional.

(ii) Appear to be maintained and stocked with supplies regularly.

(iii) Appear to be
 accessible to pupils during the schoolday.

(iv) Appear to be in compliance with Section 35292.5.

(N) The sanitary sewer system controls odor as designed, displays no signs of stoppage, backup, or flooding, in the facilities or on school grounds, and appears to be functioning properly.

(O) Roofs, gutters, roof drains, and downspouts appear to be functioning properly and are free of visible damage and evidence of disrepair when observed from the ground inside and outside the building.

(P) The school grounds do not exhibit signs of drainage problems, such as visible evidence of flooded areas, eroded soil, water damage to asphalt playgrounds or parking areas, or clogged storm drain inlets.

(Q) Playground equipment and exterior fixtures, seating, tables, and equipment are functional and free of significant cracks, trip hazards, holes, deterioration that affects functionality or safety, and other health and safety hazards.

(R) School grounds, fields, walkways, and parking lot surfaces are free of significant cracks, trip hazards, holes, deterioration that affects functionality or safety, and other health and safety hazards.

(S) Overall cleanliness of the school grounds, buildings, common areas, and individual rooms demonstrates that all areas appear to have been cleaned regularly and are free of accumulated refuse and unabated graffiti. Restrooms, drinking fountains, and food preparation or serving areas appear to have been cleaned each day that the school is in session.

(2) (A) On or before January 1, 2007, the Office of Public School Construction shall develop the school facility inspection and evaluation instrument and instructions for users. The school facility inspection and evaluation instrument and local evaluation instruments that meet the minimum criteria of this subdivision shall include a system that will evaluate each facility, based on the criteria listed in paragraph (1), on a scale of “good,” “fair,” or “poor,” as developed by the Office of Public School Construction, and provide an overall summary of the conditions at each school on a scale of “exemplary,” “good,” “fair,” or “poor.”

(B) On or before July 1, 2007, the Office of Public School Construction, in consultation with county offices of education, shall define objective criteria for determining the overall summary of the conditions of schools.

(C) For purposes of
 this paragraph, “users” means local educational agencies that participate in either of the programs established pursuant to this chapter, Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10), or Section 17582.

(e) “Lease” includes a lease with an option to purchase.

(f) “Project” means the facility being constructed or acquired by the state for rental to the applicant school district and may include the reconstruction or modernization of existing buildings, construction of new buildings, the grading and development of sites, acquisition of sites therefor and any easements or rights-of-way pertinent thereto or necessary for its full use including the development of streets and utilities.

(g) “Property” includes all property, real, personal or mixed, tangible or intangible, or any interest therein necessary or desirable for
 carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 88, Sec. 20.   (AB 176)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

17002.1.

As used in this chapter, construction shall include, but not be limited to, reconstruction, modernization, and replacement of facilities, and the performance of deferred maintenance activities on facilities pursuant to rules and regulations regarding those activities as may be adopted by the board. Funding for deferred maintenance activities for a facility may be approved under this chapter without regard to whether project funding for the reconstruction, modernization, or replacement of the facility is prohibited under Section 17021.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17003.

The Director of General Services shall administer this chapter and shall provide such assistance to the board as it may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17004.

The State Allocation Board is continued in existence for the purpose of this chapter. The members of the board and the Members of the Legislature meeting with the board shall receive no compensation for their services under this chapter but shall be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in connection with the performance of their duties hereunder, to be paid as an administrative expense referred to herein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17005.

In addition to all other powers and duties as are granted the board by this chapter, other statute, or the Constitution, the board shall have power to:

(a) Establish any qualifications not in conflict with other provisions of this chapter, as it deems will best serve the purposes of this chapter, for determining the eligibility of school districts to lease projects under this chapter.

(b) Establish any procedures and policies in connection with the administration of this chapter as it deems necessary.

(c) Adopt any rules and regulations for the administration of this chapter, requiring any procedure, forms, and information, as it may deem necessary.

(d) Construct and control any project.

(e) Fix rates, rents, or other charges for the use of any project acquired, constructed, rehabilitated, equipped, furnished, or for services rendered in connection with that project, and to alter, change, or modify the same at its pleasure, subject to any contractual obligation that may be entered into by the board with respect to the fixing of the rates, rents, or charges.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17005.1.

On or before June 30, 1981, and on or before June 30 of each year thereafter, the board shall approve a plan specifying (a) the amount of funds to be allocated in the forthcoming fiscal year for the purposes of deferred maintenance activities and (b) the manner in which such funds shall be allocated to applicant districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17005.3.

(a) Any school district with an average daily attendance of less than 2,501 pupils may apply to the board for a loan to cover the project activities of the first or second phase, as those phases were defined on July 1, 1993, of a project funded under this chapter. The loan shall not be utilized for the purchase of real property and shall be repaid by the school district either through a dedication of fees or charges levied pursuant to Section 17620 until the loan is repaid or upon receiving the project funding at the construction phase, but, in any event, the loan shall be repaid within five years from the date on which the board makes the loan. In addition to the other methods of repayment specified in this subdivision, the board may also notify the Controller if a school district is 90 days late in making loan repayments, in which case the Controller shall reduce the apportionments to which the school district is otherwise entitled under Section 42238 as necessary to recover past due payments and any current payments.

(b) The board may make loans under this section to the extent that the board determines that funds are available for that purpose. The total annual maximum funds that may be loaned under this section is ten million dollars ($10,000,000) per fiscal year.

(c) The board may make loans under this section only for those projects and phases that have met all of the eligibility standards of the board and receive approval for an apportionment, but for which apportionment funds are not available. In any event, the amount of the loan shall not exceed the amount that would have been eligible for apportionment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17005.5.

The board may provide a loan to any school district from the proceeds of the sale of bonds pursuant to the School Facilities Bond Act of 1992, and the 1992 School Facilities Bond Act, to provide aid for school districts in accordance with this chapter, when those proceeds are available in the State School Building Lease-Purchase Fund. In order to provide a loan, both of the following conditions shall be met:

(a) The amount of the loan shall not exceed the amount set forth in legislation enacted that specifies the loan amount.

(b) The loan shall be repaid pursuant to a schedule set forth in legislation enacted that specifies a loan repayment schedule.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17006.

(a) The board shall not enter into any lease with respect to an application for replacing inadequate school facilities unless it first has investigated and made a finding, or the governing board of a self-certifying district, as applicable, first certifies that it has investigated and made a finding, consistent with guidelines adopted by the board, that one or both of the following conditions exists:

(1) It would not be economical or good practice to rehabilitate those facilities. 

(2) The school facilities are inadequate due to their susceptibility to repeated flooding. The board shall develop and adopt regulations that define inadequacy of school facilities on the basis of susceptibility to repeated flooding. The building area of any facility found to be inadequate pursuant to this subdivision shall be excluded, for the purposes of any application for the replacement of any facility, from the calculation under this chapter of the area of adequate school construction existing in the applicant school district.

(b) The self-certifying district shall maintain documentation of each investigation and finding it conducts pursuant to subdivision (a) as may be required by the board, and the investigation and finding shall be subject to subsequent audit as the board may direct. 

(c) For purposes of this chapter, a “self-certifying district” as to any project to be funded under this chapter, is an applicant district that provides 50 percent or more of the cost of the project from funding sources other than any state program administered by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17007.

The State School Building Finance Committee, created by Section 15909 and composed of the Governor, Controller, Treasurer, Director of Finance, and Director of Education, all of whom shall serve thereon without compensation and a majority of whom shall constitute a quorum, is continued in existence for the purpose of this chapter. Two Members of the Senate appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and two Members of the Assembly appointed by the Speaker, shall meet with and advise the committee to the extent that the advisory participation is not incompatible with their respective positions as Members of the Legislature.

For purposes of this chapter the Members of the Legislature shall constitute an interim investigation committee on the subject of this chapter and as an interim investigating committee shall have the powers and duties imposed upon interim investigating committees by the Joint Rules of the Senate and the Assembly. The Director of General Services shall provide any assistance to the committee that it may require. The Attorney General shall be the legal adviser of the committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17008.

A fund is hereby created in the State Treasury to be known as the State School Building Lease-Purchase Fund. All money in the State School Building Lease-Purchase Fund, including any money deposited in that fund from any source whatsoever, and notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, is hereby continuously appropriated for expenditure pursuant to this chapter.

The State Allocation Board may apportion funds to school districts for the purposes of this chapter from funds transferred to the State School Building Lease-Purchase Fund from any source.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17008.3.

(a) The board may establish a revolving loan account within the State School Building Lease-Purchase Fund, and may allocate from the fund to that account those amounts it determines to be necessary for the purposes of this section.

(b) The board may apportion to any school district that submits to the board a statement of its intent to subsequently file a project application under this chapter, a loan for the purpose of advance planning and related administrative costs pursuant to the preparation of that application. The loan amount shall not exceed 3 percent of the estimated project cost, as determined pursuant to the building cost standards established under this chapter.

(c) If, within a period of 24 months following the receipt of any loan amounts under this section, the project for which those advance planning funds were provided has not been found by the board to be qualified for funding under this chapter, the board shall so notify the Controller, who shall reduce the apportionments to which the district is otherwise entitled under Section 42238 as necessary to repay the amount of all loans provided under this section, over such period of time as the board finds to be reasonable. The Controller shall transfer the amount of all apportionment reductions imposed under this subdivision to the revolving loan account established under this section.

(d) The repayment of loan amounts received under this section by school districts other than those described under subdivision (c) shall be accomplished by the withholding, as determined by the board, of apportionment funds that would be available to the district for purposes of the project for which the district received funding approval under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17008.5.

The board may approve projects and make apportionments in amounts not exceeding those funds on deposit in the State School Building Lease-Purchase Fund plus any amount of bonds authorized by the State School Building Finance Committee but not yet sold by the Treasurer.

Disbursements may be made under any apportionment made from any funds in the State School Building Lease-Purchase Fund, irrespective of whether there exists at the time of the disbursement a sufficient amount in the State School Building Lease-Purchase Fund to permit payment in full of all apportionments previously made. However, no disbursement shall be made from any funds required by law to be transferred to the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17009.

(a) The county superintendent of schools or county office of education shall be eligible to receive any funds from the portion of the proceeds of the sale of any state bonds that are set aside for the construction, reconstruction, or modernization of, or deferred maintenance on facilities to house special education pupils who are defined as severely handicapped and eligible pursuant to Section 17047.

(b) Subdivision (a) is only applicable if the county superintendent of schools or county office of education has filed with the State Allocation Board a regionalized facility plan, as developed and approved by the State Department of Education, that covers the county or special education local planning agency area of responsibility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17009.3.

The board may not approve any projects pursuant to this chapter on and after November 4, 1998.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 407, Sec. 2.   Effective August 27, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17009.5.

(a) Except as set forth in Section 17052, on and after November 4, 1998, the board shall only approve and fund school facilities construction projects pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10).

(b) A school district with a first priority project that has received a construction approval by the Department of General Services, Division of the State Architect, or a joint-use project approval by the board, prior to November 4, 1998, for growth or modernization pursuant to this chapter shall receive funding pursuant to this chapter for all unfunded approved project costs as it would have received under this chapter, and the increased capacity assigned to the project shall be included in calculating the district’s capacity pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10). Funds received for projects described in this subdivision shall constitute the state’s final and full contribution to these projects. The board shall not consider additional project funding except when otherwise authorized under Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10).

(c) A school district with a second priority project that has received a construction approval by the Department of General Services, Division of the State Architect prior to November 4, 1998, for growth or modernization pursuant to this chapter shall elect to do either of the following:

(1) Withdraw the application under this chapter, submit an initial report and application pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10), and receive per pupil allocations as set forth in Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10). If the district withdraws the application, any funds previously allocated under this chapter for the project shall be offset from the first grant to the district under Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10).

(2) Convert the second priority project approved under this chapter to a first priority status and receive funds in accordance with this chapter.

(d) Notwithstanding priorities established pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10), projects authorized for funding as set forth in this section shall be funded by the board pursuant to this chapter prior to funding other projects pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10).

(e) For purposes of funding priority for modernization grants under Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10), a district that applies under subdivision (b) or paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) shall retain its original project approval date.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 17017.1, West Contra Costa Unified School District shall be eligible for state facilities funds beginning November 4, 1998.

(g) The State Allocation Board shall adopt regulations to ensure that an appropriate offset is made from funds approved pursuant to this chapter, for funds awarded to school districts pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 17000) prior to November 4, 1998.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 753, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Projects [17010. - 17039.2.]

17010.

The board may construct any project, and may acquire all property necessary therefor, on any terms and conditions as it may deem advisable. When any part of the work is to be done or performed by any public body or the United States jointly or in conjunction with the board, the portion of the cost of the project to be borne by the board may be turned over to the government of the United States or to any other public body, to be expended by it in the acquisition, construction or completion of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17011.

The board may use for the payment of the costs of acquisition, construction or completion of any project any funds made available to the board by the State of California or any other funds provided by the board from any source, to be expended for accomplishing the purposes set forth in this chapter, together with the proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to the State School Building Lease-Purchase Bond Law of 1976.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17012.

The board has full charge of the acquisition, construction, completion, and control of all projects authorized by them and may proceed with such work forthwith.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17013.

Title to all property acquired, constructed, or improved by the board and the revenues and income therefrom, is in the State of California. All such property, and the income therefrom are exempt from all taxation by the State of California or by any county, city and county, city, district, political subdivision or public corporation thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17014.

(a) The board shall require the school district to make all necessary repairs, renewals, and replacements to ensure that a project is at all times kept in good repair, working order, and condition. All costs incurred for this purpose shall be borne by the school district.

(b) In order to ensure compliance with subdivision (a) and encourage applicants to maintain all buildings under their control, the board shall require the applicant to do all of the following prior to the approval of a project:

(1) Establish a restricted account within the general fund of the school district for the exclusive purpose of providing moneys for regular maintenance and routine repair of school buildings, according the highest priority to funding for the purpose set forth in subdivision (a).

(2) Agree to deposit into the account established pursuant to paragraph (1), in each fiscal year for the term of the lease agreements of all projects constructed under this chapter, a minimum amount equal to or greater than 2 percent of the general fund budget of the applicant district for that fiscal year. This paragraph is applicable only to the following districts:

(A) High school districts with average daily attendance greater than 300.

(B) Elementary school districts with average daily attendance greater than 900.

(C) Unified school districts with average daily attendance greater than 1,200.

(c) For each project funded after July 1, 1998, the board shall require the applicant school district governing board to certify, as part of the annual budget process of the school district and beginning in the fiscal year in which the project is funded by the state, that a plan has been prepared for completing major maintenance, repair, and replacement requirements for the project. For purposes of this subdivision, the term “major maintenance, repair, and replacement” means roofing, siding, painting, floor and window coverings, fixtures, cabinets, heating and cooling systems, landscaping, fences, and other items designated by the governing board of the school district. The board shall require the school district’s governing board to certify that the plan includes and is being implemented as follows:

(1) Identification of the major maintenance, repair, and replacement needs for the project.

(2) Specification of a schedule for completing the major maintenance, repair, and replacement needs.

(3) Specification of a current cost estimate for the scheduled major maintenance, repair, and replacement needs.

(4) Specification of the school district’s schedule for funding a reserve to pay for the scheduled major maintenance, repair, and replacement needs.

(5) Review of the plan annually, as a part of the annual budget process of the school district, and update, as needed, the major maintenance, repair, and replacement needs, the estimates of expected costs, and any adjustments in funding the reserve.

(6) Availability for public inspection of the original plan, and all updated versions of the plan, at the office of the superintendent of the school district during the working hours of the school district.

(7) Provision in the annual budget of the school district of a provision that states the total funding available in reserve for scheduled major maintenance, repair and replacement needs as specified in the updated plan, and an explanation if this amount is less than that specified in the updated plan. The reserve shall be maintained in the restricted account established pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) For purposes of this section, “good repair” has the same meaning as specified in subdivision (d) of Section 17002.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 900, Sec. 4.   Effective September 29, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

17015.

The board shall require the school district to insure against public liability or property damage in connection with any project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17016.

(a) The board, by the adoption of rules, may establish priorities for the construction and leasing of projects to those school districts the pupils of which will benefit most. The board may make exceptions from established priorities when it determines that to do so will benefit the pupils affected.

(b) The board may adopt rules establishing priorities for the acquisition and leasing of portable classrooms to county superintendents of schools that will most benefit pupils needing a county community school. The board shall require each county superintendent of schools who leases portable classrooms pursuant to Section 17017.2 to demonstrate that the portable classrooms are utilized solely for operation of a county community school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 485, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17017.

Each school district that desires to lease a project for a grade level maintained by it, shall submit through its governing board an application therefor to the board in the form and number of copies that the board may prescribe. Immediately upon receipt of an application in the prescribed form accompanied by the required estimate of cost, a copy thereof shall be transmitted by the board to the Director of General Services.

Each copy of the application shall be accompanied by a statement of the estimated cost of the project certified by an architect or structural engineer, and by layout plans showing the entire construction project.

Before the board approves an application for a construction project, it shall establish cost standards for all new construction included therein. The cost standards shall not exceed typical comparable new construction by school districts in the same area, or if there has been no new construction by school districts in the area, the cost standards shall not exceed the reasonable current cost of similar construction in the area. The board shall determine such typical current costs or such reasonable current costs. In applying cost standards the board shall take into account the size and type of the construction proposed and may make any deviations that in its judgment are justified. When a standard has been set by the board to cover any individual apportionment, no project shall be approved by the board in excess of the standard, unless the board shall find that in view of a subsequent increase in building costs an adjustment is warranted. No contract shall be let for a construction project which has been approved by the board if the cost exceeds the construction cost standards fixed by the board under this section for the new construction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17017.1.

(a) The West Contra Costa Unified School District shall be ineligible for any state school facilities funding for a period of five years from June 30, 1993, or until the date of the final payment on its entire debt to the state, including both principal and interest, whichever is later.

Notwithstanding the above, the school district may continue to receive funding for deferred maintenance activities and for those purposes specified in subdivision (b).

(b) The State Allocation Board shall approve funding for only those Richmond Unified School District State School Building Lease-Purchase Program projects which were approved for Phase II apportionments on or before April 1, 1993. All West Contra Costa Unified School District projects may be considered for funding by the State Allocation Board either in five years or after the complete repayment of the loan established under Section 41471, whichever is later.

(c) In the event that the State Allocation Board approves the replacement of the existing Belding Elementary School with funds currently allocated for the modernization of the Harry Ells Middle School and the Samuel Gompers Middle School, that approval shall be considered allowable exemption under subdivision (b). Authority for this exemption is repealed on November 1, 1993, if approval of Phase III construction apportionment for the replacement of the existing Belding Elementary School has not occurred.

In allowing for the possibility of this exemption, it is not the intent of the Legislature to interfere in any way with the decisionmaking authority and process of the State Allocation Board. It is the intent of the Legislature that a proposal to replace the existing Belding Elementary School with funds currently allocated to the modernization of the Harry Ells Middle School and the Samuel Gompers Middle School be submitted to the State Allocation Board under its existing procedures and policies. The State Allocation Board’s decision shall be based on the merits of the proposal, not this exemption authority. Specifically, this subdivision may not be used as justification for approval of a project to replace the Belding Elementary School.

(d) Any properties or facilities designated by the school district to be used for other than school purposes to generate capital to repay the outstanding debt shall be ineligible for deferred maintenance funding. Should any facilities receive funding for those purposes after the enactment of this legislation, and later be declared available for purposes intended to repay the debt, the value of state funding received for deferred maintenance at that facility shall be deducted from ongoing or future deferred maintenance projects in the district.

If no projects are available for offset of apportionments, the value of the deferred maintenance performed will be added to the outstanding loan balance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17017.2.

(a) The board may own, have maintained, and lease portable classrooms to any county superintendent of schools who provides a county community school program, as defined in Section 1986. These portable classrooms shall be adequately equipped to meet the educational needs of these pupils, including, but not limited to, sinks and restroom facilities.

(b) The board, with the advice of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, may have portable classrooms constructed, furnished, or equipped, and may otherwise require whatever work is necessary to place portable classrooms for county community schools where needed, including the acquisition and preparation of sites. The board shall, in consultation with the Superintendent of Public Instruction, establish standards for the acquisition of land, with land acquisition limited to no more than 10,000 square feet per portable classroom, waivable by the board only as needed to meet local zoning and land use requirements or health and safety considerations.

(c) A county superintendent of schools who desires to lease portable classrooms shall have prepared for the board’s use performance specifications for portable classrooms and bids for their construction that can be solicited from more than one responsible bidder.

(d) No portable classroom shall be made available to a county superintendent of schools unless the county superintendent of schools furnishes evidence, satisfactory to the board, that the county superintendent of schools has no other facility available for rental, lease, or purchase in the geographic service area that is economically or otherwise feasible.

(e) If at any time the board determines that a lessee’s need for particular portable classrooms that were made available to the lessee pursuant to this chapter has ceased, the board may take possession of the portable classrooms and may lease them to other county superintendents of schools or, if there is no longer a need for portable classrooms, the board may dispose of them to public or private parties in the manner it deems to be in the best interest of the state.

(f) This section does not limit the authority of a county superintendent of schools to provide facilities without assistance from the board for pupils who are enrolled in a county community school.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 893, Sec. 84.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17017.5.

(a) The board may approve, in whole or in part, an application submitted by a school district under Section 17017 or 17020 in an amount not exceeding the amount applied for as the board may deem appropriate.

(b) The board may, upon approval of the application, in whole or in part, and subsequently from time to time, make apportionments of project funding not exceeding in the aggregate the total amount determined by the board under subdivision (a) for the portion or portions of the project for which the board determines the district is ready to proceed. Subsequent to the board’s approval of a project, any requirement imposed by the board that the compliance of the project with building cost or area standards and related guidelines adopted by the board be established as a condition of the apportionment of funds under this chapter shall be satisfied, as to a project for a self-certifying district, by the certification by the district of that compliance. In addition, the board shall not require that estimates of average daily attendance be updated as to that project more often than once every 12 months subsequent to the board’s approval of the project. The self-certifying district shall maintain documentation of the compliance certified pursuant to this subdivision as may be required by the board, and that compliance shall be subject to subsequent audit as the board may direct.
